Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,151
State-certified seeds; certification agencies; nonprofit basis.

Certification work, whether conducted by the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or by any agency designated by it, shall be on a self-supporting basis and not for financial profit. The institute may designate as the agency for the certification of seed potatoes a nonstock, nonprofit cooperative association engaged in the marketing of such potatoes under exclusive marketing agreements with its growers.

Laws 1931, c. 151, § 3, p. 409;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-1818;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,151;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 55.